District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Housing Permit Streamlining Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Department of Buildings Establishment Act of 2020, effective April 5, 2021
(D.C. Law 23-269; D.C. Official Code § 10-561.01 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section
109 to read as follows:
“Sec. 109. Affordable housing accelerated plan review fees.
“(a) For purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “APR” means the Department’s Accelerated Plan Review program of
personalized, streamlined, accelerated plan review for a subset of District permit applicants, or
any substantially similar successor program.
“(2) “Area affordability target” means:

“(A) The number of units listed as a Planning Area’s 2025 Affordable
Housing Production Goal in Appendix 2 to the District’s Housing Equity Report published in
2019; or
“(B) A comparable geographic goal that the Office of Planning establishes
as a successor metric to the goals identified in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph for the purpose
of tracking equitable distribution of affordable housing.
“(3) “Qualifying affordable housing application” means an application that
satisfies the criteria in subsection (c).
“(b)(1) The Department shall offer at least a 50% fee discount to qualifying affordable
housing applications that apply for any APR program that the Department offers
“(2) The Department may adjust its APR fee schedule to offset any revenue
impact of the discount described in paragraph (1) of this subsection by increasing fees for
projects other than qualifying affordable housing projects.
“(c)(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the Department shall
recognize an application as a qualifying affordable housing application if the application is for a
site in an area that has not attained its area affordability target and the applicant submits at least
one of the following to the Department:
“(A) Documentation proving that the applicant has secured financing or
funds from the District or federal government that is conditioned on the applicant
providing income-restricted affordable housing units for a period of at least 15 years;
“(B) A sworn certification that the applicant intends to apply for financing
or funds from the District or federal government that would be conditioned on the applicant
providing income-restricted affordable housing units for a period of at least 15 years; or

“(C) A recorded property covenant that requires income-restricted
affordable housing units in amounts exceeding the requirements of the Inclusionary Zoning
Program as that term is defined in section 101(4) of the Inclusionary Zoning Implementation
Amendment Act of 2006, effective March 14, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-275; D.C. Official Code § 6-
1041.01(4)); provided, that the Mayor, pursuant to Title I of the District of Columbia
Administrative Procedure Act, approved October 21, 1968 (82 Stat. 1204; D.C. Official Code §
2-501 et seq.), may issue rules specifying a deeper level of affordability that a project must meet
to satisfy this subparagraph.
“(2) An applicant that determines that the documentation submitted pursuant to
paragraph (1) of this subsection is no longer applicable, including because of a change in
government funding availability, government funding criteria, or planned unit affordability, shall
notify the Department within 10 business days. Upon determining that an application is no
longer a qualifying affordable housing application, the Department shall either collect any
difference between the applicant’s discounted fee and the full APR fee applicable to such
application or cease to provide APR services for the application.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December

24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.